test/src/morphology/N-alkohol_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - alkohol: # Noun 129 'eng /est alkohol/fin' - full paradigm
     alkohol+N+Sg+Nom: alkohol
     alkohol+N+Sg+Gen: alkohol
     alkohol+N+Sg+Par: alkoholõ
     alkohol+N+Sg+Dat: alkoholõn
     alkohol+N+Sg+Ins: alkoholõks
     alkohol+N+Sg+Ill: alkoholõ
     alkohol+N+Sg+Ela: alkoholst
     alkohol+N+Pl+Nom: alkoholõd
     alkohol+N+Pl+Gen: alkoholõd
     alkohol+N+Pl+Par: alkoholidi
     alkohol+N+Pl+Dat: alkoholõdõn
     alkohol+N+Pl+Ins: alkoholõdõks
     alkohol+N+Pl+Ill: alkoholiž
     alkohol+N+Pl+Ela: alkoholist
